Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201871-208.08
School or college of barbering; cosmetologists; barbers; course hours; credit.

(1) Cosmetologists licensed in the State of Nebraska attending a barber school or college may be given credit of one thousand hours of training applied toward the course hours required for graduation.

(2) Barbers licensed in the State of Nebraska attending a school of cosmetology may be given credit of one thousand hours of training applied toward the course hours required for graduation.

Laws 1978, LB 722, § 7;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 83.
July 19, 2018